California, session 20252026, AB1196.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 1255.4 is added to the Health and Safety Code, to read:1255.4. On or before January 1, 2029, the department shall update Section 70435(b)(2) of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations to reflect current professional standards of care relating to extracorporeal bypass surgery.SECTION 1.Section 1255.4 is added to the Health and Safety Code, to read:1255.4.(a)When a general acute care hospital is performing cardiac surgery, a minimum of one surgeon who meets the requirements of Section 70435(b)(1) of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations, and two additional individuals, each of whom is either a physician’s assistant or a registered nurse that meets the requirements established in Sections 70706 and 70706.1 of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations, shall constitute a surgical team for the performance of all cardiovascular operative procedures that require extracorporeal bypass.(b)On or before January 1, 2027, the department shall amend its regulations to be consistent with this section.SEC. 2.No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because the only costs that may be incurred by a local agency or school district will be incurred because this act creates a new crime or infraction, eliminates a crime or infraction, or changes the penalty for a crime or infraction, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code, or changes the definition of a crime within the meaning of Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution.